Montana, session 2025, HB228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 5-4-208, MCA, is amended to read:
"5-4-208. (Temporary) Report Biannual report of actual costs for legislation with projected
fiscal impact. (1) Except for the general appropriations act and any bill exempted by the legislature, for each
bill with an estimated expenditure amount of over $1 million $500,000 from the general fund in any 1 of the 4
fiscal years identified in the bill's fiscal note, or as required in the bill, that is passed and approved for which a
fiscal note is prepared and presented to the legislature, the office of budget and program planning shall prepare
and present an annual a report to the legislative finance committee by October 1 of each year every February
and October.
(2) (a) The February report The report must include the following information:
(a)(i) the name of the bill;
(b)(ii) the actual expenditures incurred based on the bill as enacted for the past entire fiscal year
during the first 2 quarters of the preceding fiscal year, and a description of how the funds were expended; and
(c)(iii) a comparison to the projected costs of the bill as projected in the fiscal note for that same fiscal
year period of time.
(b) The October report must include the following information:
(i) the name of the bill;
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 228
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 228
(ii) the actual expenditures incurred based on the bill as enacted during the last 2 quarters of the
preceding fiscal year, and a description of how the funds were expended; and
(iii) a comparison to the projected costs of the bill as projected in the fiscal note for that same
period of time.
(2) The report to the legislature must include bills that qualify under subsection (1) for which a
fiscal note was prepared which have been in effect for at least 1 fiscal year. The bill must be included in the
report for each year 6-month period a cost was projected in a corresponding fiscal note.
(3) The report must be provided in an electronic format.
(4) The report must also be submitted to the legislature as provided in 5-11-210. (Terminates
December 31, 2025--sec. 6, Ch. 350, L. 2021.)"
Section 2. Repealer. Section 6, Chapter 350, Laws of 2021, is repealed.
Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective June 30, 2025.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 228
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 228, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 228
INTRODUCED BY B. MERCER
AN ACT REVISING REQUIREMENTS FOR THE REPORTING OF ACTUAL COSTS FOR LEGISLATION WITH
PROJECTED FISCAL IMPACTS; MODIFYING THE REPORTING PERIOD TO EVERY SIX MONTHS;
REVISING REPORTING REQUIREMENTS; REPEALING A TERMINATION DATE; AMENDING SECTION 5-4-
208, MCA; REPEALING SECTION 6, CHAPTER 350, LAWS OF 2021; AND PROVIDING AN EFFECTIVE DATE.